Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-7802
Federal Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2021; requirements; Primary Care Investment Council; purpose.

On December 27, 2020, the federal Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2021, Public Law 116-260, became law. It requires group health plans, health insurance issuers, and health insurance plans to provide data to the federal government on the total amount of spending on hospital costs; health care provider and clinical service costs, for primary care and specialty care separately; costs for prescription drugs; and other medical costs, including wellness services. Primary care is important to the health of individuals and has been associated with better health outcomes at lower costs. The purpose of the Primary Care Investment Council is to analyze the data collected by the federal government in accordance with the federal Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2021, and other data sources, to assist the Legislature in understanding:

(1) The current amount of health care spending on primary care in Nebraska from public and private sources;

(2) Barriers to residents of Nebraska accessing primary care;

(3) Barriers to health payors and medical providers in investing in primary care;

(4) Alternative payment models that deliver high-quality care and spend health care dollars more wisely;

(5) The public health benefits for Nebraska residents if the level of primary care investment in Nebraska increased;

(6) The estimated cost savings for health care consumers as well as public and private payors if the level of primary care investment increased in Nebraska;

(7) Nebraska's investment in primary care services relative to other states; and

(8) Health outcomes in Nebraska relative to other states.

Laws 2022, LB863, § 12.